Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202677-6803
Definitions, where found.

For purposes of the ImagiNE Nebraska Act, the definitions found in sections 77-6804 to 77-6825 shall be used.

Laws 2020, LB1107, § 3.